Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2238.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8153 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 8153. Support of emergency medical services.* * *(g) Report.--(1) The department shall submit an annual report to the Auditor General and the General Assembly no later than October 1 of each year.(2) The report shall include, at a minimum:(i) A complete accounting of all expenditures from the Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund for the preceding fiscal year.(ii) Documentation accounting for all payments from 123456789101112131415161718 the Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund used for statutorily authorized purposes . (iii) A list of all recipients that received funds from the Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund and documentation of their compliance with accounting and reporting requirements.(iv) A corrective action plan for any noncompliant recipient of funding from the Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund . (3) The department shall publish the report on its publicly accessible Internet website within seven days of submission under paragraph (1).(h) Conditional release of administrative funds.--(1) If the department fails to submit the report under subsection (g) by the deadline, all administrative funds from the Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund allocated to the department shall be withheld by the Secretary of Health until full compliance is met.(2) An EMS agency, ambulance service, rescue squad, fire department or regional EMS council may not have its operational funding from the Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund withheld, delayed or reduced as a result of department noncompliance under this subsection.(3) Administrative funds withheld under this subsection shall lapse to the Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund and may not be reappropriated to the department if the department fails to comply within 180 days of the deadline.(i) Accountability.--(1) The Secretary of Health and director of the Bureau of Emergency Medical Services shall each submit a sworn 20260HB2238PN2931 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certification verifying the accuracy and completeness of the report under subsection (g).(2) A false certification made knowingly or recklessly shall be subject to penalty under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(3) Failure to file the certification under this subsection shall result in:(i) Suspension of the director of the Bureau of Emergency Medical Services' eligibility for performance bonuses or salary increases for that fiscal year.(ii) Mandatory appearance by the Secretary of Health before the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives within 30 days.(j) Independent verification.--(1) The Auditor General shall annually verify the completeness and accuracy of the report under subsection (g).(2) No new funds from the Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund may be released to department administrative accounts until the Auditor General certifies that the department has implemented all corrective actions recommended in prior audits.(3) The verification requirement shall not delay or reduce operational payments from the Emergency Medical Services Operating Fund to local EMS agencies or regional EMS councils.(k) Corrective directives.-- If the department fails to comply with the provisions of this section, the Secretary of Health shall be : (1) Prohibited from using funds from the Emergency 20260HB2238PN2931 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Medical Services Operating Fund for administrative salaries until compliance is met.(2) Mandated to implement specific internal controls. The internal controls shall be shared with the Auditor General.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2238PN2931 - 4 - 123456